fi_FI.aff
SFX J   0     tanikin     in
SFX J   0     tanikaan    in
SFX J   0     taniko      in
SFX J   0     tanipa      in
SFX J   0     tanihan     in
SFX J   0     tanikinko   in
SFX J   0     tanikaanko  in
SFX J   0     tanikohan   in
SFX J   0     tanipahan   in
SFX J   0     tasikin     in
SFX J   0     tasikaan    in
SFX J   0     tasiko      in
SFX J   0     tasipa      in
SFX J   0     tasihan     in
SFX J   0     tasikinko   in
SFX J   0     tasikaanko  in
SFX J   0     tasikohan   in
SFX J   0     tasipahan   in
SFX J   0     tansakin    in
SFX J   0     tansakaan   in
SFX J   0     tansako     in
SFX J   0     tansapa     in
SFX J   0     tansahan    in
SFX J   0     tansakinko  in
SFX J   0     tansakaanko in
SFX J   0     tansakohan  in
SFX J   0     tansapahan  in
SFX J   0     tammekin    in
SFX J   0     tammekaan   in
SFX J   0     tammeko     in
SFX J   0     tammepa     in
SFX J   0     tammehan    in
SFX J   0     tammekinko  in
SFX J   0     tammekaanko in
SFX J   0     tammekohan  in
SFX J   0     tammepahan  in
SFX J   0     tannekin    in
SFX J   0     tannekaan   in
SFX J   0     tanneko     in
SFX J   0     tannepa     in
SFX J   0     tannehan    in
SFX J   0     tannekinko  in
SFX J   0     tannekaanko in
SFX J   0     tannekohan  in
SFX J   0     tannepahan  in
SFX J   n     mpaanikin   in
SFX J   n     mpaanikaan  in
SFX J   n     mpaaniko    in
SFX J   n     mpaanipa    in
SFX J   n     mpaanihan   in
SFX J   n     mpaanikinko in
SFX J   n     mpaanikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpaanikohan in
SFX J   n     mpaanipahan in
SFX J   n     mpaasikin   in
SFX J   n     mpaasikaan  in
SFX J   n     mpaasiko    in
SFX J   n     mpaasipa    in
SFX J   n     mpaasihan   in
SFX J   n     mpaasikinko in
SFX J   n     mpaasikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpaasikohan in
SFX J   n     mpaasipahan in
SFX J   n     mpaansakin  in
SFX J   n     mpaansakaan in
SFX J   n     mpaansako   in
SFX J   n     mpaansapa   in
SFX J   n     mpaansahan  in
SFX J   n     mpaansakinko in
SFX J   n     mpaansakaanko in
SFX J   n     mpaansakohan in
SFX J   n     mpaansapahan in
SFX J   n     mpaammekin  in
SFX J   n     mpaammekaan in
SFX J   n     mpaammeko   in
SFX J   n     mpaammepa   in
SFX J   n     mpaammehan  in
SFX J   n     mpaammekinko in
SFX J   n     mpaammekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpaammekohan in
SFX J   n     mpaammepahan in
SFX J   n     mpaannekin  in
SFX J   n     mpaannekaan in
SFX J   n     mpaanneko   in
SFX J   n     mpaannepa   in
SFX J   n     mpaannehan  in
SFX J   n     mpaannekinko in
SFX J   n     mpaannekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpaannekohan in
SFX J   n     mpaannepahan in
SFX J   n     mpananikin  in
SFX J   n     mpananikaan in
SFX J   n     mpananiko   in
SFX J   n     mpananipa   in
SFX J   n     mpananihan  in
SFX J   n     mpananikinko in
SFX J   n     mpananikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpananikohan in
SFX J   n     mpananipahan in
SFX J   n     mpanasikin  in
SFX J   n     mpanasikaan in
SFX J   n     mpanasiko   in
SFX J   n     mpanasipa   in
SFX J   n     mpanasihan  in
SFX J   n     mpanasikinko in
SFX J   n     mpanasikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpanasikohan in
SFX J   n     mpanasipahan in
SFX J   n     mpanansakin in
SFX J   n     mpanansakaan in
SFX J   n     mpanansako  in
SFX J   n     mpanansapa  in
SFX J   n     mpanansahan in
SFX J   n     mpanansakinko in
SFX J   n     mpanansakaanko in
SFX J   n     mpanansakohan in
SFX J   n     mpanansapahan in
SFX J   n     mpanammekin in
SFX J   n     mpanammekaan in
SFX J   n     mpanammeko  in
SFX J   n     mpanammepa  in
SFX J   n     mpanammehan in
SFX J   n     mpanammekinko in
SFX J   n     mpanammekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpanammekohan in
SFX J   n     mpanammepahan in
SFX J   n     mpanannekin in
SFX J   n     mpanannekaan in
SFX J   n     mpananneko  in
SFX J   n     mpanannepa  in
SFX J   n     mpanannehan in
SFX J   n     mpanannekinko in
SFX J   n     mpanannekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpanannekohan in
SFX J   n     mpanannepahan in
SFX J   n     mpianikin   in
SFX J   n     mpianikaan  in
SFX J   n     mpianiko    in
SFX J   n     mpianipa    in
SFX J   n     mpianihan   in
SFX J   n     mpianikinko in
SFX J   n     mpianikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpianikohan in
SFX J   n     mpianipahan in
SFX J   n     mpiasikin   in
SFX J   n     mpiasikaan  in
SFX J   n     mpiasiko    in
SFX J   n     mpiasipa    in
SFX J   n     mpiasihan   in
SFX J   n     mpiasikinko in
SFX J   n     mpiasikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiasikohan in
SFX J   n     mpiasipahan in
SFX J   n     mpiansakin  in
SFX J   n     mpiansakaan in
SFX J   n     mpiansako   in
SFX J   n     mpiansapa   in
SFX J   n     mpiansahan  in
SFX J   n     mpiansakinko in
SFX J   n     mpiansakaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiansakohan in
SFX J   n     mpiansapahan in
SFX J   n     mpiammekin  in
SFX J   n     mpiammekaan in
SFX J   n     mpiammeko   in
SFX J   n     mpiammepa   in
SFX J   n     mpiammehan  in
SFX J   n     mpiammekinko in
SFX J   n     mpiammekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiammekohan in
SFX J   n     mpiammepahan in
SFX J   n     mpiannekin  in
SFX J   n     mpiannekaan in
SFX J   n     mpianneko   in
SFX J   n     mpiannepa   in
SFX J   n     mpiannehan  in
SFX J   n     mpiannekinko in
SFX J   n     mpiannekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiannekohan in
SFX J   n     mpiannepahan in
SFX J   n     mpienikin   in
SFX J   n     mpienikaan  in
SFX J   n     mpieniko    in
SFX J   n     mpienipa    in
SFX J   n     mpienihan   in
SFX J   n     mpienikinko in
SFX J   n     mpienikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpienikohan in
SFX J   n     mpienipahan in
SFX J   n     mpiesikin   in
SFX J   n     mpiesikaan  in
SFX J   n     mpiesiko    in
SFX J   n     mpiesipa    in
SFX J   n     mpiesihan   in
SFX J   n     mpiesikinko in
SFX J   n     mpiesikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiesikohan in
SFX J   n     mpiesipahan in
SFX J   n     mpiensakin  in
SFX J   n     mpiensakaan in
SFX J   n     mpiensako   in
SFX J   n     mpiensapa   in
SFX J   n     mpiensahan  in
SFX J   n     mpiensakinko in
SFX J   n     mpiensakaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiensakohan in
SFX J   n     mpiensapahan in
SFX J   n     mpiemmekin  in
SFX J   n     mpiemmekaan in
SFX J   n     mpiemmeko   in
SFX J   n     mpiemmepa   in
SFX J   n     mpiemmehan  in
SFX J   n     mpiemmekinko in
SFX J   n     mpiemmekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiemmekohan in
SFX J   n     mpiemmepahan in
SFX J   n     mpiennekin  in
SFX J   n     mpiennekaan in
SFX J   n     mpienneko   in
SFX J   n     mpiennepa   in
SFX J   n     mpiennehan  in
SFX J   n     mpiennekinko in
SFX J   n     mpiennekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiennekohan in
SFX J   n     mpiennepahan in
SFX J   n     mpiinikin   in
SFX J   n     mpiinikaan  in
SFX J   n     mpiiniko    in
SFX J   n     mpiinipa    in
SFX J   n     mpiinihan   in
SFX J   n     mpiinikinko in
SFX J   n     mpiinikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiinikohan in
SFX J   n     mpiinipahan in
SFX J   n     mpiisikin   in
SFX J   n     mpiisikaan  in
SFX J   n     mpiisiko    in
SFX J   n     mpiisipa    in
SFX J   n     mpiisihan   in
SFX J   n     mpiisikinko in
SFX J   n     mpiisikaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiisikohan in
SFX J   n     mpiisipahan in
SFX J   n     mpiinsakin  in
SFX J   n     mpiinsakaan in
SFX J   n     mpiinsako   in
SFX J   n     mpiinsapa   in
SFX J   n     mpiinsahan  in
SFX J   n     mpiinsakinko in
SFX J   n     mpiinsakaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiinsakohan in
SFX J   n     mpiinsapahan in
SFX J   n     mpiimmekin  in
SFX J   n     mpiimmekaan in
SFX J   n     mpiimmeko   in
SFX J   n     mpiimmepa   in
SFX J   n     mpiimmehan  in
SFX J   n     mpiimmekinko in
SFX J   n     mpiimmekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiimmekohan in
SFX J   n     mpiimmepahan in
SFX J   n     mpiinnekin  in
SFX J   n     mpiinnekaan in
SFX J   n     mpiinneko   in
SFX J   n     mpiinnepa   in
SFX J   n     mpiinnehan  in
SFX J   n     mpiinnekinko in
SFX J   n     mpiinnekaanko in
SFX J   n     mpiinnekohan in
SFX J   n     mpiinnepahan in
SFX J   n     mpinanikin  in
SFX J   n     mpinanikaan in
